Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5739.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-25-28 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-25 entitled "Criminal
Injuries Compensation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-25-28. Special indemnity account for criminal injuries compensation.
(a) It is provided that the general treasurer establish a violent crimes indemnity account
within the general fund for the purpose of paying awards granted pursuant to this chapter. The court
shall assess as court costs in addition to those provided by law, against all defendants charged with
a felony, misdemeanor, or petty misdemeanor, or traffic violation, whether or not the crime was a
crime of violence, and who plead nolo contendere, guilty or who are found guilty of the commission
of those crimes as follows:
(1) Where the offense charged is a felony and carries a maximum penalty of five (5) or
more years imprisonment, one hundred and fifty dollars ($150) or fifteen percent (15%) of any fine
imposed on the defendant by the court, whichever is greater.
(2) Where the offense charged is a felony and carries a maximum penalty of less than five
(5) years imprisonment, ninety dollars ($90.00) or fifteen percent (15%) of any fine imposed on
the defendant by the court, whichever is greater.
(3) Where the offense charged is a misdemeanor, thirty dollars ($30.00) or fifteen percent
(15%) of any fine imposed on the defendant by the court, whichever is greater.
(4) Where the offense charged is a civil or criminal traffic violation, one dollar ($1.00) of
any fine imposed on the defendant per charged offense, exclusive of fines imposed for violations

relating to parking of vehicles. The clerks of courts for each municipality shall collect any fine
levied under this subsection and shall transmit the collected surcharges within thirty (30) days to
the crime victims' compensation fund.
(b) These costs shall be assessed whether or not the defendant is sentenced to prison and
in no case shall they be waived by the court unless the court finds an inability to pay.
(c) When there are multiple counts or multiple charges to be disposed of simultaneously,
the judge shall have the authority to suspend the obligation of the defendant to pay on all counts or
charges above two (2).
(d) Up to fifteen percent (15%) of the state funds raised under this section, as well as federal
matching funds, shall be available to pay administrative expenses necessary to operate this
program. Federal funds for this purpose shall not supplant currently available state funds, as
required by federal law.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect one year after passage.
========
LC001700
========
LC001700 - Page 2 of 3